ro-RO: Design al capcanei vii: Cutie; Găleată; Cușcă; Țarc; Plasă căzătoare; Buclă; Țarc; Tub; Altele
vi: Thiết kế bẫy nhân đạo: Hộp; Xô; Lồng; Chuồng nhốt; Lưới thả; Vòng; Bút; Ống; Khác
cs: Provedení živolovné pasti: Krabice; Kbelík; Klec; Ohrádka; Padací síť; Smyčka; Ohrada; Tubus; Jiné
lt-LT: Nežalojančių spąstų dizainas: Dėžutė; Kibirėlis; Narvas; Koralas; Nuleidžiamas tinklas; Kilpiniai; Pieštukas; Vamzdis; Kita
th: การออกแบบกับดักแบบขัง: กล่อง; แบบถัง; ทรงกรง; แบบคอกล้อมจับ; แบบตาข่ายปล่อยตกครอบ; ห่วง; คอก; หลอด; อื่นๆ
es: Diseño de trampas vivas: Caja; Cubo; Jaula; Corral; Red Drop; Bucle; Redil; Tubo; Otros
hr-HR: Dizajn zamke za hvatanje živih životinja: Kutija; Kantica; Kavezni; Ogradna živolovka; Živolovka s padajućom mrežom; Petlja; Ograda; Cijev; Ostalo
sl-SI: Zasnova žive pasti: Škatla; Vedro; Kletka; Ograda; Drop mreža; Zanka; Pisalo; Tuba; Druga
bg-BG: Дизайн на капани за живи животни: Кутия; Кофа; Клетка; Корал; Падаща мрежа; Примка; Кошара; Тръба; Друго
el: Σχεδιασμός παγίδας σύλληψης ζωντανών ζώων: Κουτί; Κουβάς; Κλωβός; Μαντρί; Δίκτυο Drop; Βρόχος; Pen; Σωληνοειδής; Άλλο
sv: Design för levandefångstfälla: Låda; Hink; Bur; Fålla; Drop nätet; Slinga; Hage; Tub; Övrigt
ja: 捕獲器のデザイン: ボックス; バケツ; ケージ; コラル; ドロップネット; ループ; ペン; チューブ; その他
nl: Ontwerp van vangkooi: Box; Emmer; Kooi; Corral; Valnet; Lus; Kooi; Tube; Overig
pt-BR: Design de armadilha de captura viva: Caixa; Balde; Jaula; Compartimento organizador; Rede coletora; Loop; Cercado; Tubo; Outro
fi: Elävänä pyytävän loukun rakenne: Laatikko; Ämpäri; Häkki; Aita; Pudotusverkko; Lenkki; Karsina; Putkilo; Muu
pt-PT: Design da gaiola armadilha: Caixa; Balde; Gaiola; Curral; Rede suspensa; Laço; Caneta; Tubo; Outro
de: Lebendfallendesign: Kasten; Behälter; Käfig; Pferch; Netzfalle; Schlinge; Pen; Rohr; Sonstiges
da: Levendefældes design: Boks; Spand; Bur; Corral; Drop net; Løkke; Bås; Tube; Andet
fr: Conception du piège à capture vivante: Boîte; Récipient; Cage; Enclos; Filet tombant; Bouclé; Enclos; Tube; Autre
zh-TW: 活捕陷阱設計: 盒狀; 桶狀; 籠狀; 圍捕; 垂落撈網; 環狀; 筆形; 管狀; 其他
ru: Конструкция живоловки: Короб; Ведро; Клетка; Загон; Падающая сеть; Петля; Вольер; Труба; Другое
tr: Canlı yakalama tuzağı tasarımı: Kutu; Kova; Kafes; Çit tipi; Düşmeli ağ; Halka; Kalem; Tüp; Diğer
nb: Levende felledesign: Eske; Bøtte; Bur; Innhegning; Dropp-nett; Løkke; Penn; Slange; Annet
zh-CN: 活物捕捉器设计: 盒式; 桶式; 笼式; 围栏式; 落网式; 环形; 围栏式; 管式; 其他
ko: 포획용 덫 디자인: 상자; 바구니; 케이지; 울타리형; 투망형; 루프 고리; 펜; 튜브; 기타
it: Design della trappola per animali: Scatola; Secchio; In gabbia; Recinto; Drop; Nodo; A penna; Tubo; Altro
hu: Élvefogó csapda kialakítása: Doboz; Vödör; Ketrec; Karám; Csapóháló; Hurok; Karám; Cső; Egyéb
sk-SK: Konštrukcia živej pasce: Škatuľa; Vedro; Klietka; Ohrada; Padacia sieť Drop; Slučka; Ohrada; Tuba; Iné
pl: Konstrukcja pułapki żywej: Skrzynkowa; Wiadro; Klatka; Typ zagroda; Siatka opadająca; Pętla; Zagroda; Tunel; Pozostałe
en: Live trap design: Box; Bucket; Cage; Corral; Drop net; Loop; Pen; Tube; Other